Florida, session 2026, SB604.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âPart III of chapter 448, Florida Statutes, 19 consisting of ss. 448.31, 448.32, and 448.33, Florida Statutes, 20 is created and entitled the âVoluntary Portable Benefits Act.â 21 Section 2.âSection 448.31, Florida Statutes, is created to 22 read: 23 448.31âShort title.âThis part may be cited as the 24 âVoluntary Portable Benefits Act.â 25 Section 3.âSection 448.32, Florida Statutes, is created to 26 read: 27 448.32âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 28 (1)ââHiring partyâ means a person who hires or enters into 29 a contract with an independent contractor or a sole proprietor. 30 (2)(a)ââIndependent contractorâ means a person who meets at 31 least four of the following criteria: 32 1.âMaintains a separate business with his or her own work 33 facility, truck, equipment, materials, or similar 34 accommodations. 35 2.âHolds or has applied for a federal employer 36 identification number, unless the person is a sole proprietor 37 who is not required to obtain a federal employer identification 38 number under state or federal regulations. 39 3.âReceives compensation for services rendered or work 40 performed, and such compensation is paid to a business rather 41 than to an individual. 42 4.âHolds one or more bank accounts in the name of the 43 business entity for purposes of paying business expenses or 44 other expenses related to services rendered or work performed 45 for compensation. 46 5.âPerforms work or is able to perform work for any entity 47 in addition to or besides the hiring party at his or her own 48 election without the necessity of completing an employment 49 application or process. 50 6.âReceives compensation for work or services rendered on a 51 competitive-bid basis or completion of a task or a set of tasks 52 as defined by a contractual agreement, unless such contractual 53 agreement expressly states that an employment relationship 54 exists. 55 (b)âIf a person does not meet at least four of the criteria 56 pursuant to paragraph (a), a person may still be presumed to be 57 an independent contractor and not an employee if the person: 58 1.âPerforms or agrees to perform specific services or work 59 for a specific amount of money and controls the means of 60 performing the services or work; 61 2.âIncurs the principal expenses related to the service or 62 work that he or she performs or agrees to perform; 63 3.âIs responsible for the satisfactory completion of the 64 work or services that he or she performs or agrees to perform; 65 4.âReceives compensation for work or services performed for 66 a commission or on a per-job basis and not on any other basis; 67 5.âMay realize a profit or suffer a loss in connection with 68 performing work or services; 69 6.âHas continuing or recurring business liabilities or 70 obligations; or 71 7.âHas success or failure in the personâs business which 72 depends on the relationship of business receipts to 73 expenditures. 74 (3)(a)ââPortable benefits accountâ means an account that 75 is: 76 1.âOpened by an independent contractor or a sole proprietor 77 to fund the purchase of one or more benefit plans and is 78 administered by a third-party portable benefits account provider 79 chosen by the independent contractor or the sole proprietor; and 80 2.âAssigned to a beneficiary of one or more benefit plans 81 rather than to a hiring party. 82 (b)âAs used in paragraph (a), the term âbenefit planâ 83 includes, but is not limited to, the following products: 84 1.âHealth insurance. 85 2.âIncome replacement insurance. 86 3.âLife insurance. 87 4.âRetirement benefits. 88 (4)ââPortable benefits account providerâ means the 89 administrator of a portable benefits account and includes: 90 (a)âA bank, as defined in s. 220.62(1). 91 (b)âAn investment management firm. 92 (c)âA technology provider or program manager that offers 93 services through a bank or an investment management firm. 94 (d)âAny other person that demonstrates to the satisfaction 95 of the Financial Services Commission that the manner in which 96 the person will administer the portable benefits account will be 97 consistent with the portable benefits account requirements under 98 s. 448.33. 99 (5)ââSole proprietorâ has the same meaning as in s. 440.02. 100 Section 4.âSection 448.33, Florida Statutes, is created to 101 read: 102 448.33âVoluntary contributions to portable benefits 103 accounts for independent contractors and sole proprietors.â 104 (1)âAny person or entity, including an independent 105 contractor; a sole proprietor; a hiring party, whether a public 106 or private entity; or an Internet-based or application-based 107 company, may voluntarily contribute funds to a portable benefits 108 account for an independent contractor or a sole proprietor. 109 (2)(a)âContributions to a portable benefits account may not 110 be used as a criterion for determining a workerâs employment 111 classification. 112 (b)âContributions to a portable benefits account may be 113 made using: 114 1.âThe funds of the hiring party; or 115 2.âA percentage of funds withheld from compensation owed to 116 the independent contractor or sole proprietor, if all the 117 following conditions are met: 118 a.âThe withholdings are voluntary and expressly agreed to 119 in writing, and the agreement is written in clear and 120 unambiguous language and prominently displayed in the work 121 contract or a separate notice. 122 b.âThe withholdings require the independent contractor or 123 sole proprietor to opt in, and the independent contractor or 124 sole proprietor may choose to opt out of the withholdings at any 125 time. 126 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.